Texas, session 892, HB311.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF TEXAS: SECTION 1.  DEFINITIONS. In this Act: (1)  "Board" means the Texas Water Development Board. (2)  "Flood hazard area" means an area of land designated as: (A)  a flood hazard area by the Federal Emergency Management Agency under the National Flood Insurance Act of 1968 (42 U.S.C. Section 4001 et seq.); or (B)  flood prone or not reasonably safe from flooding under the base level engineering model developed by the Federal Emergency Management Agency. SECTION 2.  STUDY. (a) The board shall conduct a study to assess the need for standards related to the placement of recreational vehicles and any temporary dwelling structures that are or will be located in a flood hazard area. (b)  The board may consult with the Federal Emergency Management Agency and any other federal or state agency for the purpose of collecting information necessary to conduct the study required by Subsection (a) of this section. SECTION 3.  REPORT AND LEGISLATIVE RECOMMENDATIONS. (a) Not later than January 1, 2027, the board shall submit to the governor, lieutenant governor, speaker of the house of representatives, and each other member of the legislature a report on the findings of the study required by this Act. (b)  The report must include recommendations for legislation to address the findings of the study. SECTION 4.  EXPIRATION. This Act expires February 1, 2027. SECTION 5.  EFFECTIVE DATE. This Act takes effect on the 91st day after the last day of the legislative session.